Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-244
Telephone solicitations; restrictions.

A person shall not initiate a telephone solicitation, other than a call made for emergency purposes, using an automatic dialing-announcing device to: (1) An emergency telephone line, including 911 or any emergency or business line of a hospital, physician or medical service office, health care facility, poison control center, fire protection agency, or law enforcement agency; (2) the telephone line of any guest room or patient room of a hospital, health care facility, nursing home, or similar facility; (3) any telephone number assigned to a paging service, a cellular telephone service, a specialized mobile radio service, any other radio common carrier service, or any service for which the person called is charged for the call; or (4) a residential or business telephone line unless the telephone solicitation is otherwise permitted by the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1208;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 106.